Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.110

Size and characteristics of brand.

No brand shall be placed on livestock that is not permanent in nature and of a size that is not readily visible. The director, in order to assure that brands are readily visible, may prescribe the size of branding irons to be used for ownership brands.

[ 1959 c 54 s 11.]